Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.325

Duties of guardian for adult.

(1) A guardian for an adult is a fiduciary and owes the highest duty of good faith and care to the person under a guardianship. The guardian shall not substitute his or her moral or religious values, opinions, or philosophical beliefs for those of the person under a guardianship. Except as otherwise limited by the court, a guardian for an adult shall make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the adult subject to guardianship to the extent necessitated by the adult's limitations.

(2) A guardian for an adult shall promote the self-determination of the adult and, to the extent reasonably feasible, encourage the adult to participate in decisions, act on the adult's own behalf, and develop or regain the capacity to manage the adult's personal affairs. In furtherance of this duty, the guardian shall:

(a) Become or remain personally acquainted with the adult and maintain sufficient contact with the adult, including through regular visitation, to know the adult's abilities, limitations, needs, opportunities, and physical and mental health;

(b) To the extent reasonably feasible, identify the values and preferences of the adult and involve the adult in decisions affecting the adult, including decisions about the adult's care, dwelling, activities, or social interactions; and

(c) Make reasonable efforts to identify and facilitate supportive relationships and services for the adult.

(3) A guardian for an adult at all times shall exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence when acting on behalf of or making decisions for the adult. In furtherance of this duty, the guardian shall:

(a) Take reasonable care of the personal effects, pets, and service or support animals of the adult and bring a proceeding for a conservatorship or protective arrangement instead of conservatorship if necessary to protect the adult's property;

(b) Expend funds and other property of the adult received by the guardian for the adult's current needs for support, care, education, health, and welfare;

(c) Conserve any funds and other property of the adult not expended under (b) of this subsection for the adult's future needs, but if a conservator has been appointed for the adult, pay the funds and other property at least quarterly to the conservator to be conserved for the adult's future needs; and

(d) Monitor the quality of services, including long-term care services, provided to the adult.

(4) In making a decision for an adult subject to guardianship, the guardian shall make the decision the guardian reasonably believes the adult would make if the adult were able unless doing so would unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the adult. To determine the decision the adult subject to guardianship would make if able, the guardian shall consider the adult's previous or current directions, preferences, opinions, values, and actions, to the extent actually known or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian.

(5) If a guardian for an adult cannot make a decision under subsection (4) of this section because the guardian does not know and cannot reasonably determine the decision the adult probably would make if able, or the guardian reasonably believes the decision the adult would make would unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the adult, the guardian shall act in accordance with the best interests of the adult. In determining the best interests of the adult, the guardian shall consider:

(a) Information received from professionals and persons that demonstrate sufficient interest in the welfare of the adult;

(b) Other information the guardian believes the adult would have considered if the adult were able to act; and

(c) Other factors a reasonable person in the circumstances of the adult would consider, including consequences for others.

(6) A guardian for an adult immediately shall notify the court if the condition of the adult has changed so that the adult is capable of exercising rights previously removed.

(7) The guardian shall file with the court within thirty days of any substantial change in the condition of the person under guardianship or any changes in the residence of the person under guardianship and shall provide a copy of the notice to the adult subject to guardianship, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5) or a subsequent order, and any other person the court has determined is entitled to notice.

(8) To inform any person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5) or a subsequent order, and any other person the court has determined is entitled to notice, but in no case more than five business days, after the person subject to guardianship:

(a) Makes a change in residence that is intended or likely to last more than fourteen calendar days;

(b) Has been admitted to a medical facility for acute care in response to a life-threatening injury or medical condition that requires inpatient care;

(c) Has been treated in an emergency room setting or kept for hospital observation for more than twenty-four hours; or

(d) Dies, in which case the notification must be made in person, by telephone, or by certified mail.

[ 2019 c 437 s 313.]